Hawaii statutes.
§138-11 Dispute resolution.
(a) Any communications service provider, reseller, independent, third-party
accounting firms, consultants, or other third party retained by the State under
section 138-2, or public safety answering point aggrieved by a decision of the
board shall have the right to petition the board for reconsideration within ten
days following the rendering of the board's decision. As part of its petition
for reconsideration, the aggrieved party may present any reasonable evidence or
information for the board to consider. The board shall render its decision on
the reconsideration petition as soon as reasonably possible, but no later than
thirty days after the reconsideration request is made.

(b) An aggrieved party, following the
completion of the reconsideration petition process, upon agreement of the other
party, may have the dispute resolved through final and binding arbitration by a
single arbitrator in accordance with the Industry Arbitration Rules of the
American Arbitration Association. The costs of the arbitration, including the
fees and expenses of the arbitrator, shall be borne by the nonprevailing party
of any arbitration proceeding. The arbitrator's decision shall be final and
binding and may be confirmed and enforced in any court of competent
jurisdiction.

(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude any
communications service provider, reseller, independent, third-party accounting
firms, consultants, or other third party retained by the State under section
138-2, or public safety answering point from pursuing any existing right or
remedy to which it is entitled in any court having jurisdiction thereof. [L
2004, c 159, pt of §2; am L 2011, c 168, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next